Utah statutes.
23-25-7.   Applicability of other laws.

Except as expressly required by provisions of this compact, nothing herein shall be construed to affect the right of any participating state to apply any of its laws relating to license privileges to a person or circumstance or to invalidate or prevent any agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a participating state and a nonparticipating state concerning wildlife law enforcement.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 1992 General Session

